Washington statutes.
RCW 15.21.050

Injunction.

Any person, prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of the provisions of this chapter in the superior court in the county where such violation occurs or is about to occur, notwithstanding the existence of any other remedies at law.

[ 1965 c 61 s 5.]